tools/nvda/louis/tables/my-g2.ctb
# PaZout				
always ပ	1234-126
always ပါ	1234
always ပါ့	1234-126
always ပါး	1234-1-23
always ပိ	1234-24
always ပီ	1234-246
always ပီး	1234-246-23
always ပု	1234-136-2
always ပူ	1234-136
always ပူ့	1234-136-2
always ပူး	1234-136-23
always ပေ	1234-156
always ပေ့	1234-156-2
always ပေး	1234-156-23
always ပဲ	1234-2346-23
always ပဲ့	1234-2346-2
always ပံ	1234-124
always ပံ့	1234-124-2
always ပို	1234-135
always ပို့	1234-135-2
always ပိုး	1234-135-23
always ပက်	1234-15
always ပေါက်	1234-356
always ပိုက်	1234-346
always ပုဂ်	1234-236
always ပင်	1234-35
always ပင့်	1234-35-2
always ပင်း	1234-35-23
always ပေါင်	1234-2356
always ပေါင့်	1234-2356-2
always ပေါင်း	1234-2356-23
always ပိုင်	1234-235
always ပိုင့်	1234-235-2
always ပိုင်း	1234-235-23
always ပစ်	123456-1346
always ပုစ်	1234-236
always ပဇ်	123456-1346
always ပဉ်	1234-35
always ပည်း	1234-246-23
always ပဋ်	1234-126-2345
always ပါဌ်	1234-126-2345
always ပိဏ်	1234-26
always ပုဏ်	1234-14
always ပတ်	1234-126-2345
always ပိတ်	1234-156-13
always ပုတ်	1234-236
always ပါဒ်	1234-126-2345
always ပုဒ်	1234-236
always ပိုဒ်	1234-346
always ပန်	1234-124
always ပန့်	1234-124-2
always ပန်း	1234-124-23
always ပိန်	1234-26
always ပိန့်	1234-26-2
always ပိန်း	1234-26-23
always ပုန်	1234-14
always ပုန့်	1234-14-2
always ပုန်း	1234-14-23
always ပပ်	1234-126-2345
always ပုပ်	1234-236
always ပုဗ်	1234-236
always ပိမ့်	1234-26-2
always ပိမ်	1234-26
always ပိမ်း	1234-26-23
always ပုံ	1234-14
always ပုံ့	1234-14-2
always ပုံး	1234-14-23
always ပယ်	1234-2346
always ပယ့်	1234-2346-2
always ပလ်	1234-126-2345
always ပုလ်	1234-236
always ပိုလ်	1234-135
always ပိသ်	1234-156-13
always ပျ	123456-126
always ပျာ	123456-1
always ပျား	123456-1-23
always ပျူ	123456-136
always ပျူ့	123456-136-2
always ပျူး	123456-136-23
always ပျံ	123456-124
always ပျံ့	123456-124-2
always ပျို	123456-135
always ပျို့	123456-135-2
always ပျိုး	123456-135-23
always ပျက်	123456-15
always ပျတ်	123456-126-2345
always ပျောက်	123456-356
always ပျင်	123456-35
always ပျင့်	123456-35-2
always ပျင်း	123456-35-23
always ပျောင်	123456-2356
always ပျောင့်	123456-2356-2
always ပျောင်း	123456-2356-23
always ပျစ်	123456-1346
always ပျဉ်	123456-35
always ပျဉ့်	123456-35-2
always ပျဉ်း	123456-35-23
always ပျပ်	123456-126-2345
always ပျမ်	123456-124
always ပျမ့်	123456-124-2
always ပျမ်း	123456-124-23
always ပြ	123456-126
always ပြာ	123456-1
always ပြား	123456-1-23
always ပြိ	1245-2
always ပြီး	1245-23
always ပြု	123456-136-2
always ပြူ	123456-136
always ပြူး	123456-136-23
always ပြေ	123456-156
always ပြေ့	123456-156-2
always ပြေး	123456-156-23
always ပြဲ	123456-2346-23
always ပြဲ့	123456-2346-2
always ပြို	123456-135
always ပြို့	123456-135-2
always ပြိုး	123456-135-23
always ပြက်	123456-15
always ပြောက်	123456-356
always ပြိုက်	123456-346
always ပြင်	123456-35
always ပြင့်	123456-35-2
always ပြင်း	123456-35-23
always ပြောင်	123456-2356
always ပြောင့်	123456-2356-2
always ပြောင်း	123456-2356-23
always ပြိုင်	123456-235
always ပြိုင့်	123456-235-2
always ပြိုင်း	123456-235-23
always ပြစ်	123456-1346
always ပြည်	123456-246
always ပြည့်	123456-156-2
always ပြည်း	1245-23
always ပြဋ်	123456-126-2345
always ပြတ်	123456-126-2345
always ပြိတ်	123456-156-13
always ပြုတ်	123456-236
always ပြန်	123456-124
always ပြန့်	123456-124-2
always ပြန်း	123456-124-23
always ပြိန်	123456-26
always ပြိန့်	123456-26-2
always ပြိန်း	123456-26-23
always ပြုန်	123456-14
always ပြုန့်	123456-14-2
always ပြုန်း	123456-14-23
always ပြုပ်	123456-236
always ပြုဗ်	123456-236
always ပြုံ	123456-14
always ပြုံ့	123456-14-2
always ပြုံး	123456-14-23
always ပြယ်	123456-2346
always ပြသ်	123456-126-2345
always ပြိသ်	123456-156-13
always ပွ	1234-2456-126
always ပွာ	1234-2456-1
always ပွား	1234-2456-1-23
always ပွေ	1234-2456-156
always ပွေ့	1234-2456-156-2
always ပွေး	1234-2456-156-23
always ပွဲ	1234-2456-2346-23
always ပွဲ့	1234-2456-2346-2
always ပွက်	1234-2456-15
always ပွင်	1234-2456-35
always ပွင့်	1234-2456-35-2
always ပွင်း	1234-2456-35-23
always ပွတ်	1234-136-2345
always ပွန်	1234-136-1345
always ပွန့်	1234-136-1345-2
always ပွန်း	1234-136-1345-23
always ပွပ်	1234-136-2345
always ပြွတ်	123456-136-2345
always ပြွန်	123456-136-1345
always ပြွန့်	123456-136-1345-2
always ပြွန်း	123456-136-1345-23
always ပြွမ်း	123456-2456-124-23
always ပြွမ့်	123456-2456-124-2
always ပြွမ်	123456-2456-124
always ပြော	123456-12456-23
always ပြော်	123456-12456
always ပြော့	123456-12456-2
always ပျော့	123456-12456-2
always ပျော	123456-12456-23
always ပျော်	123456-12456
always ပေါ	1234-12456-23
always ပေါ့	1234-12456-2
always ပေါ်	1234-12456
always ပြီ	1245
always ပိုစ်	1234-135-2
always ပဏ်	1234-124
always ပုသ်	1234-236
always ပမ်း	1234-124-23

# PhaWatHtote				
always ဖ	45-126
always ဖာ	45-1
always ဖာ့	45-126
always ဖား	45-1-23
always ဖိ	45-24
always ဖီ	45-246
always ဖီး	45-246-23
always ဖု	45-136-2
always ဖူ	45-136
always ဖူ့	45-136-2
always ဖူး	45-136-23
always ဖေ	45-156
always ဖေ့	45-156-2
always ဖေး	45-156-23
always ဖဲ	45-2346-23
always ဖဲ့	45-2346-2
always ဖို	45-135
always ဖို့	45-135-2
always ဖိုး	45-135-23
always ဖက်	45-15
always ဖောက်	45-356
always ဖဂ်	45-15
always ဖင်	45-35
always ဖင့်	45-35-2
always ဖင်း	45-35-23
always ဖိုင်	45-235
always ဖိုင့်	45-235-2
always ဖိုင်း	45-235-23
always ဖည်	123456-125-246
always ဖည့်	45-13456-156-2
always ဖည်း	45-13456-156-23
always ဖောဋ်	45-356
always ဖတ်	45-126-2345
always ဖိတ်	45-156-13
always ဖုပ်	45-236
always ဖုတ်	45-236
always ဖန်	45-124
always ဖန့်	45-124-2
always ဖန်း	45-124-23
always ဖိန်	45-26
always ဖိန့်	45-26-2
always ဖိန်း	45-26-23
always ဖုန်	45-14
always ဖုန့်	45-14-2
always ဖုန်း	45-14-23
always ဖပ်	45-126-2345
always ဖမ်	45-124
always ဖမ့်	45-124-2
always ဖမ်း	45-124-23
always ဖိမ်	45-26
always ဖိမ့်	45-26-2
always ဖိမ်း	45-26-23
always ဖုံ	45-14
always ဖုံ့	45-14-2
always ဖုံး	45-14-23
always ဖယ်	45-2346
always ဖယ့်	45-2346-2
always ဖိုလ်	45-135
always ဖုသ်	45-236
always ဖျ	123456-125-126
always ဖျာ	123456-125-1
always ဖျာ့	123456-125-1-2
always ဖျား	123456-125-1-23
always ဖျံ	123456-125-124
always ဖျံ့	123456-125-124-2
always ဖျို	123456-125-135
always ဖျို့	123456-125-135-2
always ဖျိုး	123456-125-135-23
always ဖျက်	123456-125-15
always ဖျောက်	123456-125-356
always ဖျင်	123456-125-35
always ဖျင့်	123456-125-35-2
always ဖျင်း	123456-125-35-23
always ဖျောင်း	123456-125-2356-23
always ဖျောင့်	123456-125-2356-2
always ဖျောင်	123456-125-2356
always ဖျစ်	1346
always ဖျဉ်	123456-125-35
always ဖျဉ်း	123456-125-35-23
always ဖျတ်	123456-125-126-2345
always ဖျန်	123456-125-124
always ဖျန့်	123456-125-124-2
always ဖျန်း	123456-125-124-23
always ဖျပ်	123456-125-126-2345
always ဖြ	123456-125-126
always ဖြာ	123456-125-1
always ဖြား	123456-125-1-23
always ဖြိ	123456-125-24
always ဖြီ	123456-125-246
always ဖြီး	123456-125-246-23
always ဖြူ	123456-125-136
always ဖြု	123456-125-136-2
always ဖြူး	123456-125-136-23
always ဖြေ	123456-125-156
always ဖြေ့	123456-125-156-2
always ဖြေး	123456-125-156-23
always ဖြဲ	123456-125-2346-23
always ဖြဲ့	123456-125-2346-2
always ဖြို	123456-125-135
always ဖြို့	123456-125-135-2
always ဖြိုး	123456-125-135-23
always ဖြောက်	123456-125-356
always ဖြင်	123456-125-35
always ဖြင့်	123456-125
always ဖြင်း	123456-125-35-23
always ဖြောင်	123456-125-2356
always ဖြောင့်	123456-125-2356-2
always ဖြောင်း	123456-125-2356-23
always ဖြိုင်	123456-125-235
always ဖြိုင့်	123456-125-235-2
always ဖြိုင်း	123456-125-235-23
always ဖြစ်	1346
always ဖြည်	123456-125-156
always ဖြည့်	123456-125-156-2
always ဖြည်း	123456-125-156-23
always ဖြတ်	123456-125-126-2345
always ဖြုတ်	123456-125-236
always ဖြန်	123456-125-124
always ဖြန့်	123456-125-124-2
always ဖြန်း	123456-125-124-23
always ဖြုန်း	123456-125-14-23
always ဖြုန်	123456-125-14
always ဖြုန့်	123456-125-236
always ဖြုပ်	123456-125-236
always ဖြုံ	123456-125-14
always ဖြုံ့	123456-125-236
always ဖြုံး	123456-125-14-23
always ဖွ	45-2456-126
always ဖွာ	45-2456-1
always ဖွား	45-2456-1-23
always ဖွေ	45-2456-156
always ဖွေ့	45-2456-156-2
always ဖွေး	45-2456-156-23
always ဖွဲ	45-2456-2346-23
always ဖွဲ့	45-2456-2346-2
always ဖွံ	45-136-1345
always ဖွံ့	45-136-1345-2
always ဖွင်	45-2456-35
always ဖွင့်	45-2456-35-2
always ဖွင်း	45-2456-35-23
always ဖွတ်	45-136-2345
always ဖွပ်	45-136-2345
always ဖွယ်	45-2456-2346
always ဖွယ့်	45-2456-2346-2
always ဖြော	123456-125-12456-23
always ဖြော့	123456-125-12456-2
always ဖြော်	123456-125-12456
always ဖျော	123456-125-12456-23
always ဖျော့	123456-125-12456-2
always ဖျော်	123456-125-12456
always ဖောင်	45-2356
always ဖောင့်	45-2356-2
always ဖောင်း	45-2356-23
always ဖော	45-12456-23
always ဖော့	45-12456-2
always ဖော်	45-12456
always ဖွန်	45-136-1345

# SaLain				
always ဆ	4-126
always ဆာ	234-125-1
always ဆာ့	4-126
always ဆား	4-1-23
always ဆိ	4-24
always ဆီ	4-246
always ဆီး	4-246-23
always ဆွ	4-2456-126
always ဆွာ	4-2456-1
always ဆွား	4-2456-1-23
always ဆု	4-136-2
always ဆူ	4-136
always ဆူ့	4-136-2
always ဆူး	4-136-23
always ဆေး	4-156-23
always ဆဲ	4-2346-23
always ဆဲ့	4-2346-2
always ဆံ	4-124
always ဆံ့	4-124-2
always ဆို	4-135
always ဆို့	4-135-2
always ဆိုး	4-135-23
always ဆက်	4-15
always ဆောက်	4-356
always ဆိုက်	4-346
always ဆင်	4-35
always ဆင့်	4-35-2
always ဆင်း	4-35-23
always ဆောင်	4-2356
always ဆောင့်	4-2356-2
always ဆောင်း	4-2356-23
always ဆိုင်	4-235
always ဆိုင့်	4-235-2
always ဆိုင်း	4-235-23
always ဆည်	4-2346
always ဆည့်	4-2346-2
always ဆည်း	4-2346-23
always ဆဋ်	4-126-2345
always ဆတ်	4-126-2345
always ဆိတ်	4-156-13
always ဆုတ်	4-236
always ဆန်	4-124
always ဆန့်	4-124-2
always ဆာန်	4-124
always ဆန်း	4-124-23
always ဆုန်း	4-14-23
always ဆပ်	4-126-2345
always ဆိပ်	4-156-13
always ဆုပ်	4-236
always ဆမ်း	4-124-23
always ဆိမ့်	4-26-2
always ဆိမ်း	4-26-23
always ဆုံ	4-14
always ဆုံ့	4-14-2
always ဆုံး	4-14-23
always ဆယ်	4-2346
always ဆယ့်	4-2346-2
always ဆွေ	4-2456-156
always ဆွေ့	4-2456-156-2
always ဆွေး	4-2456-156-23
always ဆွဲ	4-2456-2346-23
always ဆွဲ့	4-2456-2346-2
always ဆွံ့	4-136-1345-2
always ဆွတ်	4-136-2345
always ဆွန့်	4-136-1345-2
always ဆွန်	4-136-1345
always ဆွန်း	4-136-1345-23
always ဆွပ်	4-136-2345
always ဆွမ်း	4-2456-124-23
always ဆွယ်	4-2456-2346
always ဆွယ့်	4-2456-2346-2
always ဆော	4-12456-23
always ဆော့	4-12456-2
always ဆော်	4-12456
always ဆစ်	4-1346
always ဆီ	4-246
always ဆေ	4-156
always ဆေ့	4-156-2
always ဆွာ	4-2456-1
always ဆုန်	4-14
always ဆုန့်	4-14-2
always ဆမ်	4-124
always ဆမ့်	4-124-2
always ဆိမ်	4-26
always ဆွံ	4-2456-124
always ဆွမ်	4-2456-124
always ဆွမ့်	4-2456-124-2
